Arkansas, session 2025, HB1993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 66, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-66-514. Motor vehicle insurance fraud prohibited.
(a) If an individual who is driving a motor vehicle is rear-ended by
another individual who is driving a second motor vehicle and the individual
who is driving the second motor vehicle claims that an individual who was
driving a third motor vehicle caused the second motor vehicle to hit the
first motor vehicle but the individual who was driving the third motor
vehicle has since left the scene of the motor vehicle accident and there is
no obvious new damage to the rear-end of the second motor vehicle, then the
fault of the motor vehicle accident cannot be on the individual who was
driving the third motor vehicle that was alleged to have left the scene of
the motor vehicle accident.
(b) The fault of the motor vehicle accident under subsection (a) of
this section shall be determined to be the fault of the individual who is
driving the motor vehicle that rear-ended the first motor vehicle.


*ANS502*
04/07/2025 9:46:45 AM ANS502